src/morphology/compounding/compounding-ftb3.lexc
LEXICON NOMINALS
0    NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NOMINAL
0    NOUN    ;
0    51  ;
0    ADJECTIVE   ;


LEXICON Compounding
0    Compounding/Undashed    ;
0    Compounding/Dashed      ;
0    Compounding/Omission    ;

LEXICON Compounding/Undashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{#} Compounding/Middle      ;

LEXICON Compounding/Dashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUNDDASH][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{-} Compounding/Middle      ;

LEXICON Compounding/Omission
[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:-  #    ;

LEXICON Compounding/Middle
0    Compounding/Free    ;
0    Compounding/Final   ;

LEXICON Compounding/Initial
0    DIGITS  ;
0    ACRONYM ;
0    PREFIX  ;

LEXICON Compounding/None
0   ABBREVIATION    ;
0   PRON ;
0   ADPOSITION  ;
0   ADVERB  ;
0   CONJUNCTION ;
0   INTERJECTION    ;
0   NUM ;
0   PARTICLE    ;
0   PUNCTUATION ;
0   VERB    ;
0   FTB3_HACKS    ;

LEXICON Compounding/Free
0   NOMINAL ;


LEXICON Compounding/Final
0  SUFFIX  ;
